Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-891.01
Effect of violations on rights of action; attorney's fees.

If a declarant or any other person subject to the Nebraska Condominium Act fails to comply with any provision of the act or any provision of the declaration or bylaws, any person or class of persons adversely affected by the failure to comply has a claim for appropriate relief. The court, in an appropriate case, may award costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

Laws 1993, LB 478, § 17.